Missouri, session 2026, SB918.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 490.065, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 490.065,
to read as follows:
490.065. 1. In actions brought under chapter 451,
452, 453, 454, or 455 or in actions adjudicated in juvenile
courts under chapter 211 or in family courts under chapter
487, or in all proceedings before the probate division of
the circuit court, or in all actions or proceedings in which
there is no right to a jury trial:
(1) If scientific, technical or other specialized
knowledge will assist the trier of fact to understand the
evidence or to determine a fact in issue, a witness
qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill, experience,
training, or education may testify thereto in the form of an
opinion or otherwise;
(2) Testimony by such an expert witness in the form of
an opinion or inference otherwise admissible is not
objectionable because it embraces an ultimate issue to be
decided by the trier of fact;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 918 2
(3) The facts or data in a particular case upon which
an expert bases an opinion or inference may be those
perceived by or made known to him at or before the hearing
and must be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in
the field in forming opinions or inferences upon the subject
and must be otherwise reasonably reliable;
(4) If a reasonable foundation is laid, an expert may
testify in terms of opinion or inference and give the
reasons therefor without the use of hypothetical questions,
unless the court believes the use of a hypothetical question
will make the expert's opinion more understandable or of
greater assistance to the jury due to the particular facts
of the case.
2. In all actions except those to which subsection 1
of this section applies:
(1) A witness who is qualified as an expert by
knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education may
testify in the form of an opinion or otherwise if the
proponent demonstrates to the court that it is more likely
than not that:
(a) The expert's scientific, technical, or other
specialized knowledge will help the trier of fact to
understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue;
(b) The testimony is based on sufficient facts or data;
(c) The testimony is the product of reliable
principles and methods; and
(d) The [expert has reliably applied] expert's opinion
reflects a reliable application of the principles and
methods to the facts of the case;
(2) An expert may base an opinion on facts or data in
the case that the expert has been made aware of or
personally observed. If experts in the particular field

SB 918 3
would reasonably rely on those kinds of facts or data in
forming an opinion on the subject, they need not be
admissible for the opinion to be admitted. But if the facts
or data would otherwise be inadmissible, the proponent of
the opinion may disclose them to the jury only if their
probative value in helping the jury evaluate the opinion
substantially outweighs their prejudicial effect;
(3) (a) An opinion is not objectionable just because
it embraces an ultimate issue.
(b) In a criminal case, an expert witness shall not
state an opinion about whether the defendant did or did not
have a mental state or condition that constitutes an element
of the crime charged or of a defense. Those matters are for
the trier of fact alone;
(4) Unless the court orders otherwise, an expert may
state an opinion and give the reasons for it without first
testifying to the underlying facts or data. But the expert
may be required to disclose those facts or data on cross-
examination.
3. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a
person, partnership, association, or corporation, as owner,
from testifying as to the reasonable market value of the
owner's land.
✓